District of Columbia statutes.
47-1354

Payment of other taxes and liabilities by purchaser; assignment.

(a)

After the 6-month waiting period set forth in § 47-1370, as may be reduced under § 47-1353, has expired, the purchaser may pay other taxes, interest, and penalties owing on the real property for any period for which the real property has not been validly sold.

(b)

Upon payment as specified in § 47-1361(a) or by another purchaser under § 47-1382(c), the purchaser shall receive a refund of its payment made under this section, with interest as required to be paid by the redeemer or such other purchaser. The purchaser shall receive interest only on the principal tax amount paid and not on the interest or penalties paid. The purchaser is entitled to the refund only if the purchaser’s certificate of sale is not void and the purchaser provides proof satisfactory to the Mayor that the purchaser made the payment.

(c)

If the certificate becomes void, a payment credited to the account of the real property under this section shall be nonrefundable.

(d)

The Mayor shall prescribe, by regulation, the procedures for making a payment under this section. Notwithstanding any other law, the Mayor may require payment to be made directly to the Office of Tax and Revenue or any other entity, and payment may be held in escrow or applied as designated.

(e)

The purchaser shall immediately notify the Mayor, in the manner that the Mayor shall prescribe, of a payment made under this section. If the purchaser fails to notify the Mayor, the Mayor shall not be liable to the purchaser for the amount of the payment.

(f)

If the purchaser assigns a certificate of sale in accordance with § 47-1349, the purchaser shall also assign to the assignee the purchaser’s interest in the payment made under this section. The purchaser shall immediately notify the Mayor of the assignments in the manner that the Mayor may prescribe. Failure of the purchaser to assign the interest at the time the certificate of sale is assigned, or to immediately notify the Mayor of the assignment of the interest, shall invalidate the assignment of the certificate of sale and the assignment of the interest.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 11(hh), 50 DCR 896
Dec. 4, 2014, D.C. Law 20-141, § 101(c)(17), 61 DCR 7763
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, §§ 7102(c)(17), 7104, 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7037(h), 62 DCR 10905

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-1349 and § 47-1382.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-282, in subsec. (a), substituted “pay other taxes” for “pay the taxes” and substituted “validly sold” for “sold or bid off’.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-141, repealed before its effective date, would have rewritten (b).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote (b).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “such other purchaser” for “the other purchaser” in (b).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12(mm) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12(mm) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(r)(13) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-179, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 424).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(oo) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(pp) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(pp) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(c)(18) of the Residential Real Property Equity and Transparency Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-342, May 28, 2014, 61 DCR 5691).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(c)(18) of the Residential Real Property Equity and Transparency Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-409, Aug. 1, 2014, 61 DCR 8281).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7112(c)(17) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7102(c)(17) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7102(c), see the first § 2(q) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-461, November 6, 2014, 61 DCR 11784, 20 STAT 4368).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7102(c)(17) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7102(c), see the first § 2(q) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-587, January 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1294, 21 STAT 758).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7016(v)(12) and (y)(2) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 20-141 became effective on Dec. 4, 2014, but was repealed prior to its effective date by emergency D.C. Act 20-377, § 7114, eff. July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, by emergency D.C. Act 20-449, § 7104, eff. October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, by emergency D.C. Act 20-569, § 7104, eff. January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, and by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7104, 61 DCR 9990.

Applicability of D.C. Law 21-36: Section 7048(b) of D.C. Law 21-36 provided that §§ 7027, 7031, 7036, and 7037 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 21-36: Section 7132(e)(1) of D.C. Law 21-36 provided that § 7132(a),(b), and (c) of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2015.